Hawaii statutes.
§334-60.6 Period of detention. The
psychiatric facility may detain a subject for a period of time ordered by the
court not to exceed ninety days from date of admission unless sooner discharged
by the facility pursuant to section 334-76 or section 334-74. At the end of
the ninety-day period the subject shall be discharged automatically except as
provided in sections 704-406, 704-411, and 706-607, unless before expiration of
the period and by a proceeding initiated pursuant to section 334-60.3 the facility
obtains a court order for the subject's recommitment. Recommitment for a
period not to exceed ninety days may not be ordered unless the court determines
that the criteria for involuntary hospitalization set forth in section 334-60.2
continue to exist. If at the end of a recommitment period the court finds that
the criteria for involuntary hospitalization set forth in section 334-60.2
continue to exist and are likely to continue beyond ninety days, the court may
order recommitment for a period not to exceed one hundred eighty days.

Nothing in this section shall preclude a
facility from accepting for voluntary inpatient treatment, in accordance with
the procedures in section 334-60.1, a patient, for whom the facility
contemplates discharge pursuant to section 334-60.7 and who voluntarily agrees
to further hospitalization after the period of commitment has expired, or where
the patient is no longer a proper subject for commitment. [L 1984, c 188, pt of
§3; gen ch 1985; am L 1988, c 44, §1]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next